Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Grand Divisions and State Capital

4-1-201. Grand divisions.

There are three (3) grand divisions of the state: the eastern, middle and western.

Code 1858, § 100 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3); Shan., § 129; Acts 1923, ch. 70; Code 1932, § 147; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-109.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Criminal Law: An Overview of the Courts and a Compendium of Tennessee Criminal Procedure, 5 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 90 (1975).

4-1-202. Eastern grand division.

The eastern division comprises the counties of Anderson, Bledsoe, Blount, Bradley, Campbell, Carter, Claiborne, Cocke, Cumberland, Grainger, Greene, Hamblen, Hamilton, Hancock, Hawkins, Jefferson, Johnson, Knox, Loudon, Marion, McMinn, Meigs, Monroe, Morgan, Polk, Rhea, Roane, Scott, Sevier, Sullivan, Unicoi, Union and Washington.

Code 1858, § 101 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 8); Acts 1885, ch. 107, § 1; 1899, ch. 150, § 1; 1903, ch. 110, § 1; 1915, ch. 9, §§ 1-3; Shan., § 130; Private Acts 1919, ch. 695; Code 1932, § 148; Acts 1933, ch. 135, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 148; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-110.

4-1-203. Middle grand division.

The middle division comprises the counties of Bedford, Cannon, Cheatham, Clay, Coffee, Davidson, DeKalb, Dickson, Fentress, Franklin, Giles, Grundy, Hickman, Houston, Humphreys, Jackson, Lawrence, Lewis, Lincoln, Macon, Marshall, Maury, Montgomery, Moore, Overton, Perry, Pickett, Putnam, Robertson, Rutherford, Sequatchie, Smith, Stewart, Sumner, Trousdale, Van Buren, Warren, Wayne, White, Williamson and Wilson.

Code 1858, § 102 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 8); Acts 1885, ch. 107, § 1; 1899, ch. 150, § 1; 1903, ch. 110, § 1; 1915, ch. 9, §§ 1-3; Shan., § 131; Code 1932, § 149; Acts 1933, ch. 135, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 149; Acts 1965, ch. 354, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-111.

4-1-204. Western grand division.

The western division comprises the counties of Benton, Carroll, Chester, Crockett, Decatur, Dyer, Fayette, Gibson, Hardeman, Hardin, Haywood, Henderson, Henry, Lake, Lauderdale, Madison, McNairy, Obion, Shelby, Tipton and Weakley.

Code 1858, § 103 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 8); Shan., § 132; Code 1932, § 150; Acts 1965, ch. 354, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-112.

4-1-205. State capital.

The city of Nashville, in the county of Davidson, is the seat of the state government.

Code 1858, § 74 (deriv. Const. 1834, schedule, § 2); Shan., § 92; Code 1932, § 100; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-105.